New Jersey, session 221, S1718.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) is amended to read as follows: 1.    [No person shall] It shall be an unlawful practice for a person to send an unsolicited check to an individual which, upon being cashed or redeemed, automatically obligates the recipient to pay any fee or enrolls that individual in any club, service, plan, or continuing agreement. For the purposes of this act, an "unsolicited check" means any check mailed or otherwise delivered to a person, other than: a.     In response to a request or application for a check or account by the person; b.    As a substitute for a check or account previously issued to the person to whom the check is mailed or otherwise delivered; or c.     A check related to a consumer credit transaction or consumer loan business issued or provided by an insured depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C.s.1813, a licensee under the New Jersey Consumer Finance Licensing Act, sections 1 through 49 of P.L.1996, c.157 (C.17:11C-1 et seq.), or other financial institution authorized to do business by the New Jersey Department of Banking and Insurance. (cf: P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) is amended to read as follows: 2.    [a.]     A person [who violates] in violation of section 1 of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) shall be subject to a civil penalty [in an amount not to exceed $500 for the first violation and $1,000 for each subsequent violation, collectible by the Attorney General in] of up to $500 for a first offense, and up to $1,000 for a second offense, to be collected in a civil action by a summary proceeding pursuant to the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). [b.  Nothing set forth in P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) shall be construed as creating, establishing or authorizing a private cause of action by an aggrieved person against a person who has violated, or is alleged to have violated, the provisions of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.)] The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings for the enforcement of the penalty provided by this section. A third violation of section 1 of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) is an unlawful practice under P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), and for the purposes of this section shall be considered a first offense under P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). A fourth or subsequent violation of section 1 of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) is an unlawful practice under P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), and for the purposes of this section shall be considered a subsequent offense under P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately but in no event shall be effective prior to the effective date of P.L.2015, c.120 (C.2A:65D-6 et seq.).